Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-726
Character education; outline of instruction; duty of Commissioner of Education.

The Commissioner of Education shall prepare an outline with suggestions such as in his or her judgment will best accomplish the purpose set forth in section 79-725 and shall incorporate the same in the regular course of study for the first twelve grades of all schools of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1927, c. 85, § 2, p. 253;

C.S.1929, § 79-2132;

R.S.1943, § 79-2140;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 21, p. 700;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-215;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 400.